New York, session 2025-2026, S5179.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of housing preservation and development is 2 hereby directed to place a two year moratorium on the third party trans- 3 fer program, effective as of the date this act takes effect. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06370-01-5